src/esu.twol
! LANGUAGE: "esu"
! AUTHOR: "Lonny Alaskuk Strunk"

! This Central Alaskan Yup'ik FST morphological analyzer/generator and the 
! associated source code is available under the GNU Affero General Public 
! License (GNU AGPL v.3):
!
! Copyright (C) 2020 Lonny Alaskuk Strunk
!
! This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it under 
! the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by the Free 
! Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or (at your option) any 
! later version.
!
! This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but WITHOUT 
! ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS 
! FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU Affero General Public License for more 
! details.
!
! You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License along 
! with this program. If not, see https://www.gnu.org/licenses/.


Alphabet
    a c e g i k l m n p q r s t u v w y m̄ n̄
    vv ll ss gg rr ng n͞g u͡g u͡gg u͡r u͡rr '
    k̲:k q̲:q g̲:g r̲:r g̲g̲:gg r̲r̲:rr                 ! for -velar postbase assimilation
    %[e%] %[e%]:e                               ! HBC/Nun: initial e is not weak
    ạ ụ ġ                                       ! for (ar) droppping ; for vowel dropping in connective moods ending in a vowel ; ya(g)ar*

    A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Vv Ll Ss Gg Rr Ng N͞g U͡g U͡gg U͡r U͡rr M̄ N̄ ! pass through for [NonYupik]

    ! All operators and allomorph operators map to morpheme segmenter 
    %(e%):%> %(g%):%> %(r%):%> %(s%):%> %(t%):%> %(u%):%>
    %(ar%):%> %(ar%*%):%> %(ng%):%> ! %(ur%):%> %(aa%):%> %(a%):%>
    %(g%|t%):%> %(r%|l%):%> %(u%|i%):%>

    %+:%> %–:%> %~:%> %%:%> %::%> %`:%> %.:%> %*:%> %°:%>
    %@¹:%> %@²:%> %@³:%> %@⁴:%> %@⁵:%> %@ˡ:%> %@ˁ:%> %@ʸ:%> %@:%>  
    %=; 

Sets 
    Bndry = %+ %– %~ %% %: %` %. %* %° 
        %@¹ %@² %@³ %@⁴ %@⁵ %@ˡ %@ˁ %@ʸ %@
        %(a%) %(e%) %(g%) %(r%) %(s%) %(t%) %(u%)
        %(aa%) %(ar%) %(ar%*%) %(ng%) %(ur%) %(g%|t%) %(r%|l%) %(u%|i%) ;
    AtSign = %@¹ %@² %@³ %@⁴ %@⁵ %@ˡ %@ˁ %@ʸ %@ ;

    Stop = p t c k q k̲ q̲ ;
    VoiceFric = v l s g r u͡g u͡r g̲ r̲ ġ ; 
    VlessFric = vv ll ss gg rr u͡gg u͡rr g̲g̲ r̲r̲ ;
    VoiceNasal = m n ng ;
    VlessNasal = m̄ n̄ n͞g ;

    VoiceCon = VoiceFric VoiceNasal ;
    VlessCon = VlessFric VlessNasal Stop ;

    Fric = VoiceFric VlessFric ;
    Nasal = VoiceNasal VlessNasal ;

    Con = Stop Fric Nasal w y ;

    FVow = a i u ạ ụ ;
    Vow = FVow e ;

Rules 

"a:0 = --"
a:0 <=> _ Con:0 (%*:) %–: %–: l:0 ; ! "Rule for Double Minus" ! - optional drop preceding vowel also
    except
        .#. :Con _ ; ! block meliur- -> miur-

"a:i = age/ii | aga/ii | anga/ii | aga/ii | enga/ii"
a:i <=> [.#.|%=:|:Con] _ g: %%: %:: %(e%):i Con: ; ! ag%:(e) -> ii 
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] _ g: %:: (%~:) (%(ng%):) [a:|ạ:] [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! ag:(~)(ng)a -> ii ; ag:a -> ii
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] _ %:: [ng:|%(ng%):] [a:|ạ:] [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! a:nga -> ii ; a:(ng)a -> ii

        [.#.|%=:|:Con] [a:|ạ:] g: %:: (%~:) (%(ng%):) _ [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! ag:(ng)a -> ii ; ag:a -> ii
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] [a:|ạ:|e:] %:: [ng:|%(ng%):] _ [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! a:nga -> ii ; a:(ng)a -> ii ; e:(ng)a -> ii

    except
        _ Con:0 (%*:) %–: %–: l:0 ; ! "Rule for Double Minus" ! - optional drop preceding vowel also

"ạ:0 = --"
ạ:0 <=> _ Con:0 (%*:) %–: %–: l:0 ; ! "Rule for Double Minus" ! - optional drop preceding vowel also
    except
        .#. :Con _ ; ! block meliur- -> miur-

"ạ:i = age/ii | aga/ii | anga/ii | aga/ii | enga/ii"
ạ:i <=> [.#.|%=:|:Con] _ g: %%: %:: %(e%):i Con: ; ! ag%:(e) -> ii 
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] _ g: %:: (%~:) (%(ng%):) [a:|ạ:] [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! ag:(ng)a -> ii ; ag:a -> ii
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] _ %:: [ng:|%(ng%):] [a:|ạ:] [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! a:nga -> ii ; a:(ng)a -> ii

        [.#.|%=:|:Con] [a:|ạ:] g: %:: (%~:) (%(ng%):) _ [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! ag:(ng)a -> ii ; ag:a -> ii
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] [a:|ạ:|e:] %:: [ng:|%(ng%):] _ [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! a:nga -> ii ; a:(ng)a -> ii ; e:(ng)a -> ii
    except
        _ Con:0 (%*:) %–: %–: l:0 ; ! "Rule for Double Minus" ! - optional drop preceding vowel also

"e:0 = ~ | word# | eVowPostbase | semifinaleVowPostbase | (e):e | -- | te@ "
e:0 <=> _ [ Bndry: - %`: - %(r%): ]* %~: ; ! "Rule for Tilde"
        :Vow [Bndry:%>|:0]* t:n _ [ .#. | %= ] ; ! "Word final Vte -> e:0"
        _ Bndry:+ :Vow ; ! "vowel postbases are e deleters" "(u):u"
        .#. ~[ :* :Con :VlessCon] _ [ r | g ] [ Bndry: - %(t%): - %(g%|t%): ]+ :Vow ; ! "vowel postbases are semi-final e deleters" "(u):u"   !maybe ~[:Con :VlessCon] for amlleret ? 
        [[Vow Con]|[Con VoiceCon]] _ [ r | g ] Bndry:* %%:%> Bndry:* %(e%):e ; ! "Rule (e):e"
        _ (Con:0) Bndry:* %–: %–: l:0 ; ! "Rule for Double Minus" ! - optional drop preceding vowel also
        t: _ [Bndry:-AtSign:]* AtSign: ; ! te@
    except
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] _ %:: [ng:|%(ng%):] [i:|u:] [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! e:(ng)i -> ai ; e:(ng)u -> au
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] _ %:: [ng:|%(ng%):] [a:|ạ:] [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! e:(ng)a -> ii
        .#. :Con _ ; ! block meliur- -> miur-

"e:a = e^a | engi/ai"
e:a <=> _ [ .#. | %= ] ; ! "Word final e:a"
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] _ %:: [ng:|%(ng%):] [i:|u:] [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! e:(ng)i -> ai ; e:(ng)u -> au
    except
        :Vow [Bndry:%>|:0]* t:n _ [ .#. | %= ] ; ! "Word final Vte -> e:0"

"e:i = enga/ii"
e:i <=> [.#.|%=:|:Con] _ %:: [ng:|%(ng%):] [a:|ạ:] [Bndry:|:Con|.#.] ; ! e:(ng)a -> ii

"g:0 = - | :"
g:0 <=> _ Bndry:* %–: ; ! Rule for Minus - drop consonant ending base
        Con FVow _ [%@³:|%~:] %:: %(u%): Con: ; ! ag@³:(u) -> au
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow _ %%: %:: %(e%): Con: ; ! ag%:(e) -> ii
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow _  %:: %(u%|i%): Con: ; ! ag:(u/i) -> au
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] [Bndry:|:0]* :FVow %:: _ FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! a:gu -> au
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow _ %:: FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! ag:a -> ii
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow _ %:: (%~:) %(ng%): FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! Vg:(~)(ng)V -> VV

"g̲:r = Uvular/VelarAgreement"
g̲:r <=> [r:|rr:] Bndry:* %–: Bndry:* _ ; ! Uvular/VelarAgreement

"g:k = word#"
g:k <=> _ [ .#. | %= ] ; ! Word Final changes

"gg:g = gte@(u)"
gg:g <=> _ t:0 e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ; ! CCte@³(u)/Cu
         _ t:s (') e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/s

"g̲g̲:rr = Uvular/VelarAgreement"
g̲g̲:rr <=> [r:|rr:] Bndry:* %–: Bndry:* _ ; ! Uvular/VelarAgreement

"i:0 = --"
i:0 <=> _ Con:0 Bndry:* %–: %–: l:0 ; ! "Rule for Double Minus" ! - optional drop preceding vowel also
    except
        .#. :Con _ ; ! block meliur- -> miur-

"k̲:q = Uvular/VelarAgreement"
k̲:q <=> [r:|rr:] Bndry:* %–: Bndry:* _ ; ! Uvular/VelarAgreement

"l:0 = --" ! - optional drop preceding vowel also
l:0 => Vow:0 (Con:0) Bndry:* %–: %–: _ ; ! Rule for Double Minus - 

"l:ll = te@ˡl/ll"
l:ll <=> t:0 (') e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:-%(r%):]* %@ˡ: [Bndry:-AtSign:-%(r%):]* _ ; ! te@ˡl/ll  -(r) for qimugterluni

"ll:l = lte@(u)"
ll:l <=> _ t:0 e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ; ! CCte@³(u)/Cu
         _ t:s (') e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/s

"m:m̄ = @²m"
m:m̄ <=> Con t:0 e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@²: Bndry:* _ ; ! Cte@²m/Cm̄

"n:n̄ = @¹n"
n:n̄ <=> Con t:0 e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@¹: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* _ ; ! Cte@¹n/Cn̄

"ng:0 = :"
ng:0 <=> [.#.|%=:|:Con] [Bndry:|:0]* :FVow %:: _ FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! u:nga -> ua ; a:nga -> ii
    except
         Con t:0 e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@²: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* _ ; ! Cte@²ng/Cn͞g

"ng:n͞g = @²ng"
ng:n͞g <=> Con t:0 e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@²: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* _ ; ! Cte@²ng/Cn͞g

"q̲:k = Uvular/VelarAgreement"
q̲:k <=> g: Bndry:* %–: Bndry:* _ ; ! Uvular/VelarAgreement

"r:0 = - | % | :"
r:0 <=> _ Bndry:* %–: ; ! Rule for Minus - drop consonant ending base
        [FVow|%=:] _ [Bndry: - %*:]* %%:0 ; ! Rule for Percent
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow _ %*: %%: %:: %(e%): Con: ; ! ar*%:(e) -> aa
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow _ %~:  %:: %(u%): Con: ; ! ar@³:(u) -> au
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow _ %@³: %:: %(u%): Con: ; ! ar@³:(u) -> au
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow _ %:: %(u%|i%): [Con:] ; ! ar:(u/i) -> au
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] [Bndry:|:0]* :FVow %:: _ FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! i:ru -> iu
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] [Bndry:|:0]* :FVow _ %:: FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! ar:a -> aa
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow _ (%*:) %:: (%~:) %(ng%): FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! ar(*):(~)(ng)a -> ii
        %=: _ (%*:) %:: (%~:) %(ng%): FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! =r:(~)(ng)a -> =a


"r̲:g = Uvular/VelarAgreement"
r̲:g <=> g: Bndry:* %–: Bndry:* _ ; ! Uvular/VelarAgreement

"r:q = word#"
r:q <=> _ (%*:) [ .#. | %= ] ; ! Word Final changes

"rr:0 = -"
rr:0 <=> _ Bndry:* %–: ; ! Rule for Minus - drop consonant ending base
    except
        _ Bndry:* %–: [k:|k̲:|q:|q̲:] Vow: ; ! rr-qa -> rqa

"r̲r̲:gg = Uvular/VelarAgreement"
r̲r̲:gg <=> g: Bndry:* %–: Bndry:* _ ; ! Uvular/VelarAgreement

"rr:r = rte@(u)"
rr:r <=> _ t:0 e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ; ! CCte@³(u)/Cu
         _ t:s (') e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/s

"s:0 = te~s/c | (t)s/c"
s:0 <=> t:c (') e:0 Bndry:* _ ; ! te~s/c
        %(t%):c Bndry:* _ ; ! (t)s/c

"ss:s = ste@(u)"
ss:s <=> _ t:0 e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ; ! CCte@³(u)/Cu
         _ t:s (') e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/s

"t:0 = Cte@¹n/CCn̄ | Cte@²mngv/CCm̄n͞gvv | Cte@³(u)/Cu"
t:0 <=> Con _ e: (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@¹: ; ! Cte@¹n/CCn̄
        Con _ e: (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@²: ; ! Cte@²mngv/CCm̄n͞gvv
        VlessFric:VoiceFric _ e: (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ; ! Cte@³(u)/Cu
        _ (') e: (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@⁵: ;
        _ (') e: (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:-%(r%):]* %@ˡ: ;

"t:c = tV--li/ci | te@y/c | te~s/c" 
t:c <=> _ Vow:0 (Con:0) [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* %–: %–: l:0 i ; ! te--li/ci
        _ (') e:0 [Bndry:-%(u%):-%(ng%):-AtSign:]* i ; ! te~i/ci
        _ (') e: (%°:) %:: %(u%|i%): m: ; ! te:(u/i)/ci
        _ (') e: (%°:) [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* %@ʸ: [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* y: ; ! te@y/c
        _ (') e: [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* [s:|y:] ; ! te~s/c
    except
        .#. _ ;

"t:l = Vte@²/l | te*@³(u)/l | te°@⁴gkng/l"
t:l <=> Vow _ (') e: %°: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@²: ; ! Vte°@²mngv/l
        Vow _ (') e: %°: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ; ! Vte°@³(u)/l
        _ (') e: %°: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ; ! te°@⁴gkng/l

"t:n = WordFinalVte"
t:n <=> :Vow [Bndry:%>|:0]* _ e: [ .#. | %= ] ; ! Word final Vte

"t:q = te@ˁ/q"
t:q <=> _ (') e: (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@ˁ: ; ! te@ˁ/q

"t:s = Vte@²/s | Vt'e@³(u)/s'u | Cte@⁴gkng/s"
t:s <=> Vow _ (') e: [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@²: ; ! Vte@²mngv/s
        Vow _ ' e: [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@³: ; ! Vt'e@³(u)/s'u
        [Vow|VlessFric:VoiceFric|Nasal|Stop] _ (') e: [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/s

"t:y = Vte@³(u)/Vy"
t:y <=> 
!        Vow _ (') e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@²: ; ! Vte@²mngv/y  (for HBC)
        [Vow|Nasal|Stop] _ e: [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@³: ; ! Vte@³(u)/Vy    TODO: Add t'e/y' also for HBC
!        [Vow|VlessFric:VoiceFric|Nasal|Stop] _ (') e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/y for HBC  

"u:0 = --"
u:0 <=> _ Con:0 Bndry:* %–: %–: l:0 ; ! "Rule for Double Minus" ! - optional drop preceding vowel also
    except
        .#. :Con _ ; ! block meliur- -> miur-

"u͡gg:u͡g = u͡gte@(u)"
u͡gg:u͡g <=> _ t:0 e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ; ! CCte@³(u)/Cu
           _ t:s (') e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/s

"u͡rr:u͡r = u͡rte@(u)"
u͡rr:u͡r <=> _ t:0 e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ; ! CCte@³(u)/Cu
           _ t:s (') e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/s

"v:vv = @²v"
v:vv <=> Con t:0 e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@²: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* _ ; ! Cte@²v/Cvv

"vv:v = vte@(u)"
vv:v <=> _ t:0 e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@³: ; ! CCte@³(u)/Cu
         _ t:s (') e:0 [Bndry:-%°:-AtSign:]* %@⁴: ; ! Cte@⁴gkng/s
